Illinois, session 104th, HB3648.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Welfare Act is amended by changing 5Section 3.5 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 605/3.5)7    Sec. 3.5. Information on dogs and cats available for 8adoption by an animal shelter or animal control facility.9    (a) An animal shelter or animal control facility must 10provide to the adopter prior to the time of adoption the 11following information, to the best of its knowledge, on any 12dog or cat being offered for adoption:13        (1) The breed, age, date of birth, sex, and color of 14    the dog or cat if known, or if unknown, the animal shelter 15    or animal control facility shall estimate to the best of 16    its ability.17        (2) The details of any inoculation or medical 18    treatment that the dog or cat received while under the 19    possession of the animal shelter or animal control 20    facility.21        (3) The adoption fee and any additional fees or 22    charges.23        (4) If the dog or cat was returned by an adopter, then   HB3648 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08936 AAS 18991 b1    the date and reason for the return.2        (5) The following written statement: "A copy of our 3    policy regarding warranties, refunds, or returns is 4    available upon request.".5        (6) The license number of the animal shelter or animal 6    control facility issued by the Illinois Department of 7    Agriculture. 8        (7) If the animal is a dog, then the organization from 9    which the dog was obtained, the organization's address, 10    and the organization's phone number. 11    (b) The information required in subsection (a) shall be 12provided to the adopter in written form by the animal shelter 13or animal control facility and shall have an acknowledgement 14of disclosures form, which must be signed by the adopter and an 15authorized representative of the animal shelter or animal 16control facility at the time of the adoption. The 17acknowledgement of disclosures form shall include the 18following:19        (1) A blank space for the dated signature and printed 20    name of the authorized representative handling the 21    adoption on behalf of the animal shelter or animal control 22    facility, which shall be immediately beneath the following 23    printed statement: "I hereby attest that all of the above 24    information is true and correct to the best of my 25    knowledge.".26        (2) A blank space for the dated signature and printed   HB3648 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08936 AAS 18991 b1    name of the adopter, which shall be immediately beneath 2    the following statement: "I hereby attest that this 3    disclosure was posted on or near the cage of the dog or cat 4    for adoption and that I have read all the disclosures. I 5    further understand that I am entitled to keep a signed 6    copy of this disclosure.".7    (c) A copy of the disclosures and the signed 8acknowledgement of disclosures form shall be provided to the 9adopter and the original copy shall be maintained by the 10animal shelter or animal control facility for a period of 2 11years from the date of adoption. A copy of the animal shelter's 12or animal control facility's policy regarding warranties, 13refunds, or returns shall be provided to the adopter.14    (d) An animal shelter or animal control facility shall 15post in a conspicuous place in writing on or near the cage of 16any dog or cat available for adoption the information required 17by subsection (a) of this Section 3.5.18(Source: P.A. 96-1470, eff. 1-1-11.)